Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.100

Suspension or modification of requirements of chapter.

The executive director of the agency may suspend or modify any of the requirements under this chapter in a particular case if the agency finds that:

(1) The suspension or modification is consistent with the purposes of this chapter; and

(2) The education to be offered addresses a substantial, demonstrated need among residents of the state or that literal application of this chapter would cause a manifestly unreasonable hardship.

[ 1986 c 299 s 10.]